Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-201.02
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds and declares that public libraries perform services which are vitally important for the maintenance of an educated and democratic society, including, but not limited to, providing information which stimulates thought, awareness, and involvement in issues of public interest and providing avenues for intellectual and cultural growth and enjoyment. The Legislature further finds that an educated and culturally aware society is increasingly important in an economy in which Nebraskans must compete on a global scale. It is the intent of the Legislature that Nebraskans will help lead the nation into the world of the twenty-first century.

Laws 1997, LB 250, § 9.